District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.52

License renewal.

The Board of Medicine shall renew the license of a trauma technologist who, in addition to meeting the requirements of § 3-1205.04(r), has submitted to the Board, along with an application for renewal, documentation of successful completion of 50 hours of Board-approved continuing medical education within 2 years before the date the license expires. Continuing medical education may consist of critiques, didactic session, practical drills, workshops, seminars, or other Board-approved means.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 652
as added Jan. 25, 2014, D.C. Law 20-64, § 2(g), 60 DCR 16533

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-64 added this section.